zh-TW: 鉤柄長度: 特長; 長; 短; 標準; 其他
bg-BG: Дължина на стеблото на куката: Много дълго; Дълго; Късо; Стандартно; Друго
tr: Kanca sapı uzunluğu: Ekstra uzun; Uzun; Kısa; Standart; Diğer
pt-BR: Anzol comprimento da haste: Extralongo; Longo; Curto; Padrão; Outros
sk-SK: Dĺžka drieku háčika: Extra dlhé; Dlhé; Krátke; Štandardné; Iné
es: Largo del vástago del anzuelo: Extralargo; Largo; Corto; Estándar; Otro
nb: Krokskaftlengde: Ekstra lang; Lang; Kort; Standard; Annet
ro-RO: Lungimea tijei cârligului: Foarte lung; Lung; Scurt; Standard; Altele
en: Hook shank length: Extra Long; Long; Short; Standard; Other
ja: フックシャンクの長さ: エクストラロング; ロング; ショート; スタンダード; その他
pt-PT: comprimento da haste do anzol: Extra longo; Longo; Curto; Padrão; Outro
zh-CN: 钩杆长度: 加长; 长; 短; 标准; 其他
fr: Longueur de la hampe d’hameçon: Très longue; Longue; Courte; Standard; Autre
it: Lunghezza del gambo dell'amo: Extra lunga; Lunga; Corta; Standard; Altro
sv: Krokskaftlängd: Extra lång; Lång; Kort; Standard; Annat
th: ความยาวของก้านเบ็ด: ยาวพิเศษ; ยาว; สั้น; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
fi: Koukun varren pituus: Erittäin pitkä; Pitkä; Lyhyt; Vakio; Muu
pl: Długość trzonka haczyka: Bardzo długi; Długi; Krótki; Standardowy; Inna
lt-LT: Kabliuko kotelio ilgis: Ypač ilgas; Ilgas; Trumpas; Standartinis; Kita
hr-HR: Duljina drške udice: Vrlo duga; Duga; Kratka; Standardna; Ostalo
da: Krogens skaftlængde: Ekstra lang; Lang; Kort; Standard; Andet
de: Hakenschaftlänge: Extra lang; Lang; Kurz; Standard; Andere
sl-SI: Dolžina stebla trnka: Zelo dolg; Dolg; Kratek; Standardni; Drugo
cs: Délka háčku: Extra dlouhé; Dlouhé; Krátké; Standardní; Jiné
hu: Horogszár hossza: Különösen hosszú; Hosszú; Rövid; Normál; Egyéb
ko: 낚싯바늘 길이: 엑스트라 롱; 롱; 쇼트; 스탠더드; 기타
ru: Длина цевья крючка: Удлиненное; Длинное; Короткое; Стандартное; Другое
el: Μήκος στελέχους αγκιστριού: Πολύ μακρύ; Μακρύ; Κοντό; Τυπικό; Άλλο
nl: Haak schacht lengte: Extra lang; Lang; Kort; Standaard; Overig
vi: Chiều dài thân móc: Cực dài; Dài; Ngắn; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác